Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2830.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 105 of Title 66, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Branch line" means a secondary line that branches off from
a main line; and
2. "Main line" means a Class 1 railroad documented in current
timetables filed as required pursuant to 49 C.F.R. 217.7 with the
Federal Railroad Administration. A main line is used for regular
scheduled freight or passenger service.
B. Railroads are prohibited from operating any branch line or
main line train that exceeds a length of eight thousand five hundred
(8,500) feet.
Req. No. 11145 Page 1

SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-11145 JBH 01/03/25


















Req. No. 11145 Page 2